Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-4605
Extinguishment of lien for costs
of defense services.

If the court finds that any property of the claimant was
subjected to a lien to recover costs of defense services rendered by the state
to defend the claimant in connection with the criminal case that resulted
in his or her wrongful conviction, the court shall extinguish the lien.

Laws 2009, LB260, § 5.